Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.527

Waiver of nonresident tuition fees differential for students of foreign nations—Community colleges.

Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards of the community colleges may waive all or a portion of the nonresident tuition fees differential for undergraduate students of foreign nations as follows:

(1) Priority in the awarding of waivers shall be given to students on academic exchanges and students participating in special programs recognized through formal agreements between states, cities, or institutions;

(2) The waiver programs under this section shall promote reciprocal placements and waivers in foreign nations for Washington residents. The number of foreign students granted waivers through this program shall not exceed the number of that institution's own students enrolled in approved study programs abroad during the same period;

(3) No reciprocal placements shall be required for up to thirty students participating in the Georgetown University scholarship program funded by the United States agency for international development;

(4) Participation shall be limited to one hundred full-time foreign students each year.

[ 1993 sp.s. c 18 s 18; 1992 c 231 s 14; 1989 c 245 s 5; 1987 c 12 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1993 sp.s. c 18: See note following RCW 28B.12.060.

Effective date—1992 c 231: See note following RCW 28B.10.016.

Analyses—1989 c 245: See note following RCW 43.41.415.